Maine, session 132, LD179.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 15 MRSA §1092, sub-§1, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 452, Pt. H, §3 and
affected by Pt. X, §2, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 17-A MRSA §1802, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2021, c. 447, §4 and
c. 647, Pt. B, §38 and affected by §65, is further amended by amending subparagraph (9)
to read:
(9) A Class D or Class E crime under Title 29‑A, section 2411, subsection 1‑A,
paragraph B; or
Sec. 3. 17-A MRSA §1802, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2021, c. 447, §4 and
c. 647, Pt. B, §38 and affected by §65, is further amended by amending subparagraph (10)
to read:
(10) A Class D crime under Title 17, section 1031; or
Sec. 4. 17-A MRSA §1802, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2021, c. 447, §4 and
c. 647, Pt. B, §38 and affected by §65, is further amended by repealing subparagraph (11).